Hawaii statutes.
§651-45 Postponement of sale. If, at
the time appointed for the sale, the officer deems it expedient, and for the
interest of all persons concerned therein, to postpone the sale, for want of
purchasers or for other sufficient cause, the officer may postpone it from time
to time, until the sale is completed; giving notice of every such adjournment,
by a public declaration thereof, at the time and place previously appointed for
the sale. [CC 1859, §1025; am L 1905, c 16, §1; RL 1925, §2449; RL 1935, §4148;
RL 1945, §10175; RL 1955, §233-44; HRS §651-45; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next